New Jersey, session 221, S2860.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 11. As used in this act, public school means a school district, charter school, and renaissance school project in the State.1 1[1.] 2.1  The Commissioner of Education shall administer a two-year Sports Equipment Equity Pilot Program. The program shall award grants to 1[school districts] public schools1 to help enhance school athletic programs by providing students with sports equipment and other resources to participate in sports and physical activities in schools. 1[2.] 3.1  a. A 1[school district] public school1 that wants to apply for a grant under the pilot program shall submit an application to the Commissioner of Education.  The application shall, at a minimum, include: (1) relevant information to support the 1[districts] public schools1 need for such a program; (2) information concerning the availability and quality of existing athletic program equipment and resources in the 1[district] public school1; (3) any other information as prescribed by the commissioner. b. The commissioner shall select six 1[school districts] public schools1 for participation in the pilot program.  To the maximum extent possible, the commissioner shall select 1[school districts] public schools1 in the southern, central, and northern regions of the State and shall seek a cross section of 1[school districts] public schools1 from urban, suburban, and rural areas. 1[3.] 4.1 a. At the conclusion of the pilot program each participating 1[school district] public school1 shall submit a report to the Commissioner of Education.  The report shall include, at a minimum, information on the number of students who were served by the pilot program, including the number of students in each grade level; and the 1[school districts] public schools1 views on the success and benefits of the program. b. After receiving the reports from each participating 1[school district] public school1, the commissioner shall submit a report to the Governor, and to the Legislature pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1), on the implementation and effectiveness of the pilot program. The report shall include the commissioners recommendation on the advisability of the programs continuation and expansion to additional 1[school districts] public schools1 in the State. 1[4.] 5.1  This act shall take effect immediately.